Utah statutes.
35A-4-312.5.   Suspected misuse of personal identifying information.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Personal identifying information" has the same meaning as defined in Section 76-6-1102.

(b)  "Suspected misuse of personal identifying information" includes:

(i)  a Social Security number under which wages are being reported by two or more individuals; or

(ii)  a Social Security number of an individual under the age of 16 with reported wages exceeding $1,000 for a single reporting quarter.

(2)  Notwithstanding Section 35A-4-312, if the department records disclose a suspected misuse of personal identifying information by an individual other than the purported owner of the information, the department may:

(a)  inform the purported owner of the information or, if the purported owner is a minor, the minor's parent or guardian, of the suspected misuse; and

(b)  provide information of the suspected misuse to an appropriate law enforcement agency responsible for investigating an identity fraud violation.

